New Jersey, session 222, A2637.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.48:2-14 is amended to read as follows: 48:2-14.      [No] a. A privilege or franchise granted after [May first, one thousand nine hundred and eleven] the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), to any public utility by a political subdivision of this [state] State shall not exceed seven years and shall not be valid until approved by the board.  A public utility shall submit to the board a certified copy of the privilege or franchise granted by a political subdivision that shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   the terms and conditions relating thereto and proof that all requirements relating to the attainment of the privilege or franchise have been met; (2)   a statement by the public utility giving the reason the public utility believes the privilege or franchise is necessary and proper for the public convenience and will properly protect the public interest; (3)   a provision that provides reasonable assurance that the public utility will continuously provide, pursuant to R.S.48:2-23, safe, adequate, and proper service at just and reasonable rates, as determined by the board; (4)   a provision that requires the maintenance of public utility property in good working order throughout the full term of the privilege or franchise; and (5)   a provision that the public utility shall protect the public interest in the continuous and uninterrupted public utility service during the term of the privilege or franchise. [Such] b. (1) Board approval of a privilege or franchise submitted to it, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, shall be given when, after public hearing, the board determines that the privilege or franchise is necessary and proper for the public convenience and properly [conserves the public interests] protects the public interest.  In granting its approval, the board [may] shall impose [such] conditions as to the construction, equipment, maintenance, service, or operation as the board determines the public convenience and interests may reasonably require. (2)   The board shall deny approval of a privilege or franchise submitted to it if the board finds, after public hearing, that the public utility seeking a privilege or franchise is not able to continuously provided safe, adequate, and proper service within that political subdivision at just and reasonable rates. c.     (1)     A political subdivision of this State may revoke a privilege or franchise if the governing body of the political subdivision finds, after public hearing, that the public utility violated the terms and conditions of the privilege or franchise and passes a resolution, in a manner provided by law, revoking the privilege or franchise.  If the political subdivision revokes a privilege or franchise, the political subdivision shall make provisions for the continuous and uninterrupted public utility service within that political subdivision, as determined by the board. (2)   A public utility operating in this State that seeks to provide service to a political subdivision that has revoked a privilege or franchise, pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall submit to the board, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, a certified copy of the privilege or franchise granted by the political subdivision. (3)   If a political subdivision revokes a privilege or franchise, pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, and chooses to provide electric, water, or sewer utility service within the political subdivision in a manner provided by law, the political subdivision shall submit to the board a certified copy of a statement attesting to that fact. d.    Nothing herein shall require the approval by the board of any consent of a municipality or board of boulevard commissioners for the operation of any autobus in effect March twenty-fourth, one thousand nine hundred and twenty-six, which did not then require such approval to be valid. (cf: R.S.48:2-14) 2.    R.S.48:2-23 is amended to read as follows: 48:2-23.      The board may, after public hearing, upon notice, by order in writing, require any public utility to furnish safe, adequate, and proper service, including the furnishing and performance of service in a manner that tends to conserve and preserve the quality of the environment and prevent the pollution of the waters, land, and air of this State, and including furnishing and performance of service in a manner which preserves and protects the water quality of a public water supply, and to maintain its property and equipment in such condition as to enable it to do so. The board [may] shall, pending any such proceeding, require any public utility to continue to furnish service and to maintain its property and equipment in such condition as to enable it to do so. The board, in requiring any public water utility to furnish safe, adequate, and proper service, may require [the] a public water utility to retain in its rate base any property which the board determines is necessary to protect the water quality of a public water supply. (cf: P.L.1988, c.163, s.5) 3.    R.S.48:2-42 is amended to read as follows: 48:2-42.      [Any] a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, regulation, or board order to the contrary, any person [or], public utility, or other person or entity subject to the jurisdiction of the board that shall fail to comply with [an] any law, rule, regulation, or order of the board [, except an order to resume service which has been discontinued,] shall be [subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars for every day during which the default continues.  Any person or public utility that shall fail to comply with any order of the board directing the public utility to resume service which has been discontinued shall be subject to a penalty of two hundred and fifty dollars for every day during which such default continues. Such penalties shall be recovered in an action at law in the name of the state] liable for a civil administrative penalty not to exceed $25,000 for each violation, except that any maximum civil penalty may not exceed $2,000,000 for any related series of events.  Each day during which the violation continues shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct violation. b.    Any civil administrative penalty may be compromised by the board in an amount and with conditions the board deems appropriate.  In determining the amount of the penalty, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the board shall consider: (1)   the nature, circumstances, and gravity of the violation; (2)   the degree of the violators culpability; (3)   any history of prior violations; (4)   any good faith effort on the part of the violator in attempting to achieve compliance; and (5)   any other factors the board determines to be appropriate. c.     Pursuit of any remedy specified in this section shall not preclude the pursuit of any other remedy provided by any other law except if the penalty amount set forth in any other law, rule, regulation, or board order is less than the amount set forth in P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), then amounts set forth in P.L. , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall control. d.    Civil administrative penalties may be recovered, if necessary, in a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). The Superior Court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999 in connection with P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). e.     Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, there is hereby established in the board a nonlapsing, special revenue fund called the Utilities Civil Penalty Fund into which penalties imposed or obtained pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be deposited.  The monies in the Utilities Civil Penalty Fund shall be credited to public utility customers in a manner to be determined by board regulation.  Each customer shall be awarded a pro-rata share of the funds through a credit on the public utility bill of a customer within 60 days after the date the board receives penalty monies recovered from a public utility.  Any monies received by the board that are not credited to public utility customers shall be used by a public utility to improve public utility service quality and reliability in the best interests of public utility customers in a manner specified by the board. f.     Consistent with section 1 of P.L.1988, c.100 (C.48:2-21.14), any civil administrative penalty imposed under this section shall not be recoverable from ratepayers. (cf: R.S.48:2-42) 4.    The Board of Public Utilities shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.